Montana, session 2025, HB475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Use of restraints on pregnant inmates restricted -- extraordinary circumstances --
definition. (1) Restraints may not be used on an inmate known to be pregnant during labor and delivery,
except as provided in subsection (2).
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), restraints may be used on a pregnant inmate
during labor and delivery in extraordinary circumstances in which the detention center makes an individualized
determination that:
(i) the inmate is an established flight risk; or
(ii) there is a clear threat that the inmate could harm themself or others.
(b) Leg or waist restraints may not be used on a pregnant inmate during any stage of labor and
delivery under any circumstances.
(c) Both the type of restraint applied and the application of the restraint must be done in the least
restrictive manner necessary.
(d) Restraints must be removed under the following circumstances:
(i) when the flight risk or threat to harm has been mitigated; or
(ii) at the request of a doctor, nurse, or other health care professional treating the inmate during
labor and delivery.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "restraints" means handcuffs, leg shackles, leg irons, belly
belts, belly chains, or other restraint devices used to restrict free movement of limbs or appendages, including
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 475
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 475
restraints made of cloth and leather.
Section 2. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of
Title 7, chapter 32, part 22, and the provisions of Title 7, chapter 32, part 22, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 475
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 475, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 475
INTRODUCED BY J. REAVIS, L. DEMING, E. BOLDMAN
AN ACT RESTRICTING THE USE OF RESTRAINTS ON PREGNANT INMATES; PROVIDING THAT
RESTRAINTS MAY NOT BE USED ON A PREGNANT INMATE DURING LABOR AND DELIVERY EXCEPT IN
EXTRAORDINARY CIRCUMSTANCES; AND PROVIDING A DEFINITION.”